Oklahoma, session 2025, SB336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1-181, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-181. Transporter.
Every “Transporter” shall mean every person engaged in the
business of delivering vehicles of a type required to be registered
hereunder from a manufacturing, assembling, or distributing plant to
dealers or sales agents of a manufacturer or from the place of
business of a dealer, sales agent, or auto auction to a place of
business of the same or another dealer, sales agent, or auto
auction, or while engaged in the business of dealing vehicles to a
salvage pool operated in accordance with Section 591.11 of this
title.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB336 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 24, 2025 - DO PASS






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB336 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)